Washington statutes.
RCW 43.163.020

Economic development finance authority created—Membership.

The Washington economic development finance authority is established as a public body corporate and politic, with perpetual corporate succession, constituting an instrumentality of the state of Washington exercising essential governmental functions. The authority is a public body within the meaning of RCW 39.53.010.

The authority shall consist of 17 members as follows: The director of the department of commerce, the director of the department of agriculture, the state treasurer, one member from each caucus in the house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the house, one member from each caucus in the senate appointed by the president of the senate, and ten public members with one representative of women-owned businesses and one representative of minority-owned businesses and with at least three of the members residing east of the Cascades. The public members shall be residents of the state appointed by the governor on the basis of their interest or expertise in trade, agriculture or business finance or jobs creation and development. One of the public members shall be appointed by the governor as chair of the authority and shall serve as chair of the authority at the pleasure of the governor. The authority may select from its membership such other officers as it deems appropriate.

The term of the persons appointed by the governor as public members of the authority, including the public member appointed as chair, shall be four years from the date of appointment, except that the term of three of the initial appointees shall be for two years from the date of appointment and the term of four of the initial appointees shall be for three years from the date of appointment. The governor shall designate the appointees who will serve the two-year and three-year terms.

In the event of a vacancy on the authority due to death, resignation or removal of one of the public members, or upon the expiration of the term of one of the public members, the governor shall appoint a successor for the remainder of the unexpired term. If either of the state offices is abolished, the resulting vacancy on the authority shall be filled by the state officer who shall succeed substantially to the power and duties of the abolished office.

Any public member of the authority may be removed by the governor for misfeasance, malfeasance or willful neglect of duty after notice and a public hearing, unless such notice and hearing shall be expressly waived in writing by the affected public member.

The state officials serving in ex officio capacity may each designate an employee of their respective departments to act on their behalf in all respects with regard to any matter to come before the authority. Such designations shall be made in writing in such manner as is specified by the rules of the authority.

The members of the authority shall serve without compensation but shall be entitled to reimbursement, solely from the funds of the authority, for expenses incurred in the discharge of their duties under this chapter. The authority may borrow funds from the department for the purpose of reimbursing members for expenses; however, the authority shall repay the department as soon as practicable.

A majority of the authority shall constitute a quorum.

[ 2023 c 470 s 2063; 1995 c 399 s 89; 1990 c 53 s 2; 1989 c 279 s 3.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2023 c 470: See note following RCW 10.99.030.